src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-tenevasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     теневась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: теневаˮмавнаниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: теневаˮмавнандиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: теневаˮмавнандиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: теневаˮмавнанаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: теневаˮмавнандаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: теневаˮмавнандоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: теневаˮмавнани
     теневась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [теневаˮмавнан, теневаˮмавнани]
     теневась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: теневаˮмавнанд
     теневась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: теневаˮмавнанда
     теневась+V+TV+InfPrf+Tra: теневаˮмаӈэ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1+OcDu3: теневарвахаюниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1+OcPl3: теневарбиниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1+OcSg3: теневарвамиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1: теневарваниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2+OcDu3: теневарвахаюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2+OcPl3: теневарбидиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2+OcSg3: теневарвариʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2: теневарвадиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3+OcDu3: теневарвахаюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3+OcPl3: теневарбидиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3+OcSg3: теневарвадиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3: теневарвахаʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1+OcDu3: теневарвахаюнаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1+OcPl3: теневарбинаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1+OcSg3: теневарваваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1: теневарваваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2+OcDu3: теневарвахаюдаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2+OcPl3: теневарбидаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2+OcSg3: теневарвараˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2: теневарвадаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3+OcDu3: теневарвахаюдоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3+OcPl3: теневарбидоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3+OcSg3: теневарвадоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3: теневарваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1+OcDu3: теневарвахаюн
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1+OcPl3: теневарбин
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1+OcSg3: теневарвав
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1: теневарвадмʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2+OcDu3: теневарвахаюд
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2+OcPl3: теневарбид
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2+OcSg3: теневарвар
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2: теневарван
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3+OcDu3: теневарвахаюда
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3+OcPl3: теневарбида
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3+OcSg3: теневарвада
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3: теневарва
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcDu3: [теневавандархахаюниʼ, теневавндархахаюниʼ, теневувндархахаюниʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcPl3: [теневавандархыниʼ, теневавндархыниʼ, теневувндархыниʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcSg3: [теневавандархамиʼ, теневавндархамиʼ, теневувндархамиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1: [теневавандарханиʼ, теневавндарханиʼ, теневувндарханиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcDu3: [теневавандархахаюдиʼ, теневавндархахаюдиʼ, теневувндархахаюдиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcPl3: [теневавандархыдиʼ, теневавндархыдиʼ, теневувндархыдиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcSg3: [теневавандархариʼ, теневавндархариʼ, теневувндархариʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2: [теневавандархадиʼ, теневавндархадиʼ, теневувндархадиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcDu3: [теневавандархахаюдиʼ, теневавндархахаюдиʼ, теневувндархахаюдиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcPl3: [теневавандархыдиʼ, теневавндархыдиʼ, теневувндархыдиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcSg3: [теневавандархадиʼ, теневавндархадиʼ, теневувндархадиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3: [теневавандархахаʼ, теневавндархахаʼ, теневувндархахаʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcDu3: [теневавандархахаюнаˮ, теневавндархахаюнаˮ, теневувндархахаюнаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcPl3: [теневавандархынаˮ, теневавндархынаˮ, теневувндархынаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcSg3: [теневавандархаваˮ, теневавндархаваˮ, теневувндархаваˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1: [теневавандархаваˮ, теневавндархаваˮ, теневувндархаваˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcDu3: [теневавандархахаюдаˮ, теневавндархахаюдаˮ, теневувндархахаюдаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcPl3: [теневавандархыдаˮ, теневавндархыдаˮ, теневувндархыдаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcSg3: [теневавандархараˮ, теневавндархараˮ, теневувндархараˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2: [теневавандархадаˮ, теневавндархадаˮ, теневувндархадаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcDu3: [теневавандархахаюдоʼ, теневавндархахаюдоʼ, теневувндархахаюдоʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcPl3: [теневавандархыдоʼ, теневавндархыдоʼ, теневувндархыдоʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcSg3: [теневавандархадоʼ, теневавндархадоʼ, теневувндархадоʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3: [теневавандархаˮ, теневавндархаˮ, теневувндархаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcDu3: [теневавандархахаюн, теневавндархахаюн, теневувндархахаюн]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcPl3: [теневавандархын, теневавндархын, теневувндархын]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcSg3: [теневавандархав, теневавндархав, теневувндархав]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1: [теневавандархадмʼ, теневавндархадмʼ, теневувндархадмʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcDu3: [теневавандархахаюд, теневавндархахаюд, теневувндархахаюд]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcPl3: [теневавандархыд, теневавндархыд, теневувндархыд]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcSg3: [теневавандархар, теневавндархар, теневувндархар]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2: [теневавандархан, теневавндархан, теневувндархан]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcDu3: [теневавандархахаюда, теневавндархахаюда, теневувндархахаюда]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcPl3: [теневавандархыда, теневавндархыда, теневувндархыда]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcSg3: [теневавандархада, теневавндархада, теневувндархада]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3: [теневавандарха, теневавндарха, теневувндарха]
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcDu3: теневархавэхэюниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcPl3: теневархавыниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcSg3: теневархавэмиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1: теневархавэниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcDu3: теневархавэхэюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcPl3: теневархавыдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcSg3: теневархавэриʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2: теневархавэдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcDu3: теневархавэхэюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcPl3: теневархавыдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcSg3: теневархавэдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3: теневархавэхэʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcDu3: теневархавэхэюнаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcPl3: теневархавынаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcSg3: теневархавэваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1: теневархавэваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcDu3: теневархавэхэюдаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcPl3: теневархавыдаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcSg3: теневархавэраˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2: теневархавэдаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcDu3: теневархавэхэюдоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcPl3: теневархавыдоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcSg3: теневархавэдоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3: теневархавыˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcDu3: теневархавэхэюн
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcPl3: теневархавын
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcSg3: теневархавэв
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1: теневархавэдмʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcDu3: теневархавэхэюд
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcPl3: теневархавыд
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcSg3: теневархавэр
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2: теневархавэн
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcDu3: теневархавэхэюда
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcPl3: теневархавыда
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcSg3: теневархавэда
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3: теневархавы
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: теневанарыхыниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: теневанарахамиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu1: теневанараханиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: теневанарыхыдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: теневанарахариʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu2: теневанарахадиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: теневанарыхыдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: теневанарахадиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu3: теневанарахахаʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюнаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: теневанарыхынаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: теневанарахаваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl1: теневанарахаваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюдаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: теневанарыхыдаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: теневанарахараˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl2: теневанарахадаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюдоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: теневанарыхыдоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: теневанарахадоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl3: теневанарахаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюн
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: теневанарыхын
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: теневанарахав
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg1: теневанарахадмʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюд
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: теневанарыхыд
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: теневанарахар
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg2: теневанарахан
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюда
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: теневанарыхыда
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: теневанарахада
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg3: теневанараха
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюнинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: теневанарыхынинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: теневанарахаминзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu1: теневанараханинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: теневанарыхыдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: теневанарахаринзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu2: теневанарахадинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: теневанарыхыдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: теневанарахадинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu3: теневанарахаханзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюнаць
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: теневанарыхынаць
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: теневанарахаваць
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl1: теневанарахаваць
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюдаць
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: теневанарыхыдаць
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: теневанарахараць
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl2: теневанарахадаць
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюдонзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: теневанарыхыдонзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: теневанарахадонзь
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl3: теневанарахаць
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: теневанарахахаюнась
